Illinois, session 104th, SB94.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Data 5Center Construction by Foreign Adversaries Act. 6    Section 5. Data center construction by foreign adversaries 7prohibited. 8    (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, on and 9after the effective date of this Act, no foreign company may 10construct or cause to be constructed a data center in the State 11unless the Illinois Commerce Commission, the Illinois Power 12Agency, and the Department of Commerce and Economic 13Opportunity conduct a joint study of the energy consumption of 14the prospective data center and certify to the Governor and 15the General Assembly that the energy estimated to be used by 16the data center is a self-generated load and does not affect 17the load supply of PJM or MISO.18    (b) As used in this Section:19    "Company" means a sole proprietorship, organization, 20association, corporation, partnership, joint venture, limited 21partnership, limited liability partnership, limited liability 22company, or other entity or business association, including 23all wholly owned subsidiaries, majority-owned subsidiaries,   SB0094- 2 -LRB104 03347 HLH 13369 b1parent companies, or affiliates of those entities or business 2associations.3    "Data center" has the meaning given to that term in 4Section 605-1025 of the Department of Commerce and Economic 5Opportunity Law of the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois.6    "Foreign company" means a company that:7        (1) is at least 51% owned by a foreign adversary, as 8    defined in 15 CFR 791.2; or9        (2) is headquartered in a country with a government 10    that is a foreign adversary, as defined in 15 CFR 791.2.11    "MISO" means the regional transmission organization known 12as the Midcontinent Independent System Operator, Inc.13    "PJM" means the regional transmission organization known 14as PJM Interconnection, LLC.